Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5520DP (1) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 476.20, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. The rules adopted by the commission shall 3 provide that a public utility furnishing gas or electricity 4 shall not disconnect service to a residence in the event of 5 severe cold weather or severe hot weather, as defined by such 6 rules. 7